Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Chapter 8 Funding and Refunding Bonds

Cross references. —

As to power of all cities and towns to levy and collect taxes for various purposes, see §

15-1-103

.

As to issuance and sale of bonds and certificates of indebtedness by cities operating under the city manager form of government, see §

15-4-303

.

As to local improvement bonds generally, in connection with cities and towns, see §§

15-6-431

to

15-6-436

.

As to issuance of bonds generally by cities and towns in connection with public improvements, see §

15-7-101

et seq.

As to issuance of bonds by cities and towns in connection with sewerage systems, see §§

15-7-502

to

15-7-506

.

For constitutional provision prohibiting loans, credit or donation by state or any political subdivision thereof, and requiring two-thirds vote of people for works of internal improvement, see art. 16, § 6, Wyo. Const.

As to rate of interest generally, see § 40-14-106(e).

§ 15-8-101.
When authorized; conditions; signatures; sale; amount required.

If any city or town creates any indebtedness not in excess of the taxes for the current year to pay expenses incurred in repairing or restoring improvements made necessary by any casualty or accident happening after the annual appropriation is made, or if any judgment is rendered against any city or town, or if any city or town has outstanding any other lawful indebtedness, the governing body may pay, redeem, fund or refund that judgment or indebtedness by issuing the negotiable coupon bonds of the city or town if it can be done at a lower rate of interest, or to the profit and benefit of the city or town.

The bonds shall:

Be in denominations as fixed by ordinance;

Be numbered from one (1) upward;

Be payable within thirty (30) years from the date of issue;

Bear interest at a rate designated by the governing body; and

Be payable semiannually at the office of the city or town treasurer, or at any other place designated by the governing body.

The bonds may become due serially or be redeemable as specified in the ordinance. They shall be signed by the mayor and countersigned by the clerk and the treasurer of the city or town and may be sold and disposed of in an amount sufficient for the purpose for which they were issued, as determined by the governing body. No bonds may be sold for less than their par value.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 484; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-484; Laws 1971, ch. 254, § 11; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1; 1982, ch. 28, § 1.

Transmittal of funds to pay bonds without security. —

Mayor and city council were authorized to make the city's bonds and interest coupons payable in such place as they saw fit, and to indicate by ordinance to that effect. Failure of council in its contract with fiscal agent in New York to demand security relieved city treasurer from duty of making such demand and he was justified in transmitting moneys to such agent to pay bonds and coupons, without liability for any loss sustained by failure of such agent. City of Casper v. Joyce, 54 Wyo. 198, 88 P.2d 467,

1939 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1939).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

§ 15-8-102.
Register; contents; cancellation.

The bonds shall be registered by the city or town treasurer in a book kept for that purpose. The register shall show:

The date of issue;

The number;

The amount;

To whom the bonds were issued; and

The date of redemption and payment.

The treasurer shall cause the word “paid” to be cut in the bond and coupon when they are paid.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 485; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-485; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-8-103.
Tax for interest and redemption.

A tax shall be levied and collected annually on all the taxable property within the city or town sufficient to pay the interest on the bonds and redeem them as they become due. The tax shall be levied and collected the same as other taxes of the city or town.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 486; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-486; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-8-104.
Order of redemption.

If serial bonds are issued the city or town shall redeem them as they become due. If redeemable bonds are issued the city or town, during the last half of the term the bonds have to run, shall redeem annually a portion of the principal equal to a sum produced by taking the whole amount of bonds outstanding and dividing it by the number of years the bonds then have to run.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 487; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-487; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

§ 15-8-105.
Sale or exchange; consideration acceptable; proceeds; redemption notice.

The bonds shall be sold for cash, or may be sold or exchanged for any other city or town indebtedness for the redemption of which they were issued, but no bonds may be sold or exchanged for less than their par value and the accrued interest at the time of disposal. No city or town indebtedness may be redeemed for more than its face value and the interest due. If part of the bonds are sold for money, the proceeds shall be applied exclusively toward the redemption of the indebtedness for which the bonds were issued. The treasurer of the city or town shall give notice of his readiness to redeem the indebtedness and that the interest on it shall cease after thirty (30) days from the date of the notice.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 488; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-488; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Acceptance of bid for bonds. —

Mere fact better bid is subsequently received will not authorize town to ignore its acceptance of valid bid for proposed refunding bonds, and even if acceptance was premature because no specific provision had been made for calling in bonds to be refunded, objection may be cured by subsequent resolution. Diefenderfer v. State, 13 Wyo. 387, 80 P. 667,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1905).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sale of refunding bonds under par, 33 ALR2d 1145.

§ 15-8-106.
Ordinance required.

The governing body of any city or town desiring to issue bonds pursuant to this chapter shall provide for them by ordinance.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 489; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-489; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1.

Sufficiency of ordinance. —

Rate of interest was sufficiently specified by ordinance and notice submitting proposition to issue bonds for certain public improvements stating that bonds would “bear interest at a rate not exceeding 5% per annum.” City of Cheyenne v. State, 17 Wyo. 90, 96 P. 244,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1908).

Acceptance of bid for bonds. —

Mere fact better bid is subsequently received will not authorize town to ignore its acceptance of valid bid for proposed refunding bonds, and even if acceptance was premature because no specific provision had been made for calling in bonds to be refunded objection may be cured by subsequent resolution. Diefenderfer v. State, 13 Wyo. 387, 80 P. 667,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1905).